Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.100

State trust company operating in another state—Approval of director.

(1) Upon written approval of the director, a state trust company may conduct the business of a trust company in a host state, subject to the authority, requirements, and restrictions of the host state, or as otherwise directed by a cooperative agreement between the department and the host state.

(2) The director may enter into a cooperative agreement with the host state regulator of the host state in which a state trust company is permitted to and conducts the business of a trust company and may permit the host state regulator to periodically examine the affairs of the state trust company in the host state.

(3) The director may rely upon the examination of the host state regulator in lieu of the department itself conducting an examination of the state trust company's conduct in the host state.

[ 2019 c 389 s 53.]